ja: 対応メモリーカード: CF; CF Type II; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMCマイクロ; MMCモバイル; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PROデュオ; MS PROデュオHS; MS PROデュオマーク2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HGデュオ; MS Pro-HGデュオHX; MS XC-HGデュオ; MSデュオ; MSマイクロ (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; MicroSD (トランスフラッシュ); マイクロドライブ; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; ナノメモリ (NM); 非対応; P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; SRメモリー; スマートメディア; スマートメディアxD; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; XQD; expressP2; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; その他
vi: Thẻ nhớ tương thích: CF; CF Type II; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC micro; MMC mobile; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO duo; MS PRO duo HS; MS PRO duo mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG duo; MS Pro-HG duo HX; MS XC-HG duo; MS duo; MS micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; MicroSD (TransFlash); Microdrive; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; Bộ nhớ nano (NM); Không hỗ trợ; P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; Bộ nhớ SR; Smart Media; Smart media xD; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; XQD; expressP2; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; Khác
zh-CN: 适用存储卡: CF; CF II 型; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC micro; MMC 移动; 增强型多媒体卡 (MMCplus); MS; MS PRO; MS PRO duo; MS PRO duo HS; MS PRO duo mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG duo; MS Pro-HG duo HX; MS XC-HG duo; MS duo; MS micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; MicroSD（外置记忆卡）; 微型硬盘; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; 纳米存储器 (NM); 不支持; P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; 标清; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; SR 存储; 智能媒体; 智能媒体 xD; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; XQD; expressP2; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; 其他
bg-BG: Съвместими карти с памет: CF; CF Type II; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC micro; MMC mobile; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO duo; MS PRO duo HS; MS PRO duo mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG duo; MS Pro-HG duo HX; MS XC-HG duo; MS duo; MS micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; MicroSD (transflash); Microdrive; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; Нанопамет (NM); Не се поддържа; P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; SR памет; Smart media; Smart media xD; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; XQD; expressP2; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; Други
de: Kompatible Speicherkarten: CF; CF Typ II; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC-Micro; MMC-Mobil; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO Duo; MS PRO Duo HS; MS PRO Duo Mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG Duo; MS Pro-HG Duo HX; MS XC-HG Duo; MS Duo; MS Micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; MicroSD (TransFlash); Microdrive; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; Nano Memory (NM); Nicht unterstützt; P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; SR-Memory; SmartMedia; SmartMedia xD; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; XQD; expressP2; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; Sonstiges
it: Schede di memoria compatibili: CF; CF Tipo II; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC micro; MMC mobile; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO duo; MS PRO duo HS; MS PRO duo mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG duo; MS Pro-HG duo HX; MS XC-HG duo; MS duo; MS micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; MicroSD (transflash); Microdrive; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; Memoria nano (NM); Non supportata; P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; Memoria SR; Smart media; Smart media xD; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; XQD; expressP2; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; Altro
cs: Kompatibilní paměťové karty: CF; CF Typ II; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC micro; MMC mobile; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO duo; MS PRO duo HS; MS PRO duo mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG duo; MS Pro-HG duo HX; MS XC-HG duo; MS duo; MS micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; MicroSD (transflash); Microdrive; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; Nano memory (NM); Nepodporováno; P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; SRMemory; Smart media; Smart media xD; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; XQD; expressP2; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; Jiné
da: Kompatible hukommelseskort: CF; CF Type II; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC micro; MMC mobile; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO duo; MS PRO duo HS; MS PRO duo mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG duo; MS Pro-HG duo HX; MS XC-HG duo; MS duo; MS micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; MicroSD (transflash); Microdrive; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; Nanohukommelse (NM); Ikke understøttet; P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; SR-hukommelse; Smart-medie; Smart media xD; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; XQD; expressP2; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; Andet
tr: Uyumlu Hafıza Kartları: CF; CF Tip II; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC micro; MMC mobile; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO duo; MS PRO duo HS; MS PRO duo mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG duo; MS Pro-HG duo HX; MS XC-HG duo; MS duo; MS micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; MicroSD (transflash); Microdrive; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; Nano memory (NM); Desteklenmiyor; P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; SR bellek; Akıllı medya; Smart media xD; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; XQD; expressP2; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; Diğer
pt-PT: Cartões de memória compatíveis: CF; CF Type II; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC micro; MMC mobile; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO duo; MS PRO duo HS; MS PRO duo mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG duo; MS Pro-HG duo HX; MS XC-HG duo; MS duo; MS micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; MicroSD (Transflash); Microdrive; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; Memória Nano (NM); Não suportado; P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; SR memory; Smart media; Smart media xD; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; XQD; expressP2; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; Outro
sk-SK: Kompatibilné pamäťové karty: CF; CF typ II; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC micro; MMC mobil; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO duo; MS PRO duo HS; MS PRO duo značka 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG duo; MS Pro-HG duo HX; MS XC-HG duo; MS duo; MS micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; MicroSD (transflash); Microdrive; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; Nano pamäť (NM); Nie je podporované; P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; Pamäť SR; Inteligentné médiá; Inteligentné médiá xD; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; XQD; expressP2; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; Iné
hu: Kompatibilis memóriakártyák: CF; CF Type II; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC micro; MMC mobile; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO duo; MS PRO duo HS; MS PRO duo mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG duo; MS Pro-HG duo HX; MS XC-HG duo; MS duo; MS micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; MicroSD (Transflash); Microdrive; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; Nano memory (NM); Nem támogatott; P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; SR memory; Smart media; Smart media xD; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; XQD; expressP2; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; Egyéb
th: การ์ดหน่วยความจำที่รองรับ: CF; CF Type II; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC micro; MMC mobile; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO duo; MS PRO duo HS; MS PRO duo mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG duo; MS Pro-HG duo HX; MS XC-HG duo; MS duo; MS micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; MicroSD (transflash); MicroDrive; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; นาโนเมมโมรี่ (NM); ไม่รองรับ; P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; SR Memory; SmartMedia; SmartMedia xD; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; XQD; expressP2; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; อื่นๆ
es: Tarjetas de memoria compatibles: CF; CF Tipo II; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC micro; MMC móvil; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO duo; MS PRO dúo HS; MS PRO duo mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG duo; MS Pro-HG duo HX; MS XC-HG duo; MS duo; MS micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; MicroSD (transflash); Microdrive; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; Nanomemoria (NM); No compatible; P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; SR memory; SmartMedia; Smart media xD; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; XQD; expressP2; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; Otros
fi: Yhteensopivat muistikortit: CF; CF Type II; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC micro; MMC mobile; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO duo; MS PRO duo HS; MS PRO duo mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG duo; MS Pro-HG duo HX; MS XC-HG duo; MS duo; MS micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; MicroSD (transflash); Microdrive; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; Nano memory (NM); Ei tuettu; P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; SR memory; Smart media; Smart media xD; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; XQD; expressP2; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; Muu
sv: Kompatibla minneskort: CF; CF typ II; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC micro; MMC mobil; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO duo; MS PRO duo HS; MS PRO duo mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG duo; MS Pro-HG duo HX; MS XC-HG duo; MS duo; MS micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; MicroSD (transflash); Microdrive; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; Nanominne (NM); Stöds inte; P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; Minne; Smart media; Smart media xD; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; XQD; expressP2; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; Annat
ko: 호환 가능한 메모리 카드: CF; CF 타입 II; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC 마이크로; MMC 모바일; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO duo; MS PRO duo HS; MS PRO duo mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG duo; MS Pro-HG duo HX; MS XC-HG duo; MS duo; MS micro(M2); MSXC; MicroP2; MicroSD(Tansflash); 마이크로드라이브; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; 나노 메모리(NM); 지원되지 않음; P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; SR 메모리; 스마트 미디어; 스마트 미디어 xD; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; XQD; expressP2; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; 기타
ru: Совместимые карты памяти: CF; CF Type II; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC micro; MMC mobile; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO duo; MS PRO duo HS; MS PRO duo mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG duo; MS Pro-HG duo HX; MS XC-HG duo; MS duo; MS micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; MicroSD (Transflash); Microdrive; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; Nano Memory (NM); Не поддерживается; P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; SR Memory; Smart Media; Smart Media xD; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; XQD; expressP2; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; Другое
nb: Kompatible minnekort: CF; CF Type II; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC micro; MMC mobil; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO duo; MS PRO duo HS; MS PRO duo mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG duo; MS Pro-HG duo HX; MS XC-HG duo; MS duo; MS micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; MicroSD (transflash); Microdrive; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; Nanominne (NM); Ikke støttet; P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; SR-minne; Smart media; Smart media xD; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; XQD; expressP2; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; Annen
lt-LT: Suderinamos atminties kortelės: CF; CF II tipas; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; „CFexpress“; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; „MMC micro“; „MMC mobile“; „MMCplus“; MS; MS PRO; „MS PRO duo“; „MS PRO duo HS“; „MS PRO duo mark 2“; MS Pro-HG; „MS Pro-HG duo“; „MS Pro-HG duo HX“; „MS XC-HG duo“; „MS duo“; „MS micro“ (M2); MSXC; „MicroP2“; „MicroSD“ („TransFlash“); „Microdrive“; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; „Nano memory“ (NM); Nepalaikoma; P2; „PSVita“; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; „SR memory“; „Smart Media“; „Smart Media xD“; SxS; „SxS Pro“; SxS-1; XQD; expressP2; „microSDHC“; „microSDXC“; xD; Kita
fr: Cartes de mémoire compatibles: CF; CF Type II; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC micro; MMC mobile; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO duo; MS PRO duo HS; MS PRO duo mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG duo; MS Pro-HG duo HX; MS XC-HG duo; MS duo; MS micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; MicroSD (transflash); Microdrive; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; Nanomémoire (NM); Non pris en charge; P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; Mémoire SR; Médias intelligents; Smart media xD; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; XQD; expressP2; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; Autre
zh-TW: 相容記憶卡: CF; CF II 型; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC micro; MMC mobile; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO duo; MS PRO duo HS; MS PRO duo mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG duo; MS Pro-HG duo HX; MS XC-HG duo; MS duo; MS micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; MicroSD（transflash）; 微型硬碟; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; NM 卡 (NM); 不支援; P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; SR memory; Smart media; Smart Media xD; SxS; SXS Pro; SxS-1; XQD; expressP2; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; 其他
el: Συμβατές κάρτες μνήμης: CF; CF Type II; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC micro; MMC mobile; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO duo; MS PRO duo HS; MS PRO duo mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG duo; MS Pro-HG duo HX; MS XC-HG duo; MS duo; MS micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; MicroSD (transflash); Microdrive; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; Nano memory (NM); Δεν υποστηρίζεται; P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; Μνήμη SR; Smart media; Smart media xD; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; XQD; expressP2; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; Άλλο
en: Compatible memory cards: CF; CF Type II; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC micro; MMC mobile; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO duo; MS PRO duo HS; MS PRO duo mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG duo; MS Pro-HG duo HX; MS XC-HG duo; MS duo; MS micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; MicroSD (transflash); Microdrive; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; Nano memory (NM); Not supported; P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; SR memory; Smart media; Smart media xD; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; XQD; expressP2; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; Other
sl-SI: Združljive pomnilniške kartice: CF; CF tipa II; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC micro; MMC mobile; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO duo; MS PRO duo HS; MS PRO duo mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG duo; MS Pro-HG duo HX; MS XC-HG duo; MS duo; MS micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; MicroSD (transflash); Microdrive; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; Nano pomnilnik (NM); Ni podprto; P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; SR memory; Smart media; Smart media xD; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; XQD; expressP2; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; Drugo
pt-BR: Cartões de memória compatíveis: CF; CF Tipo II; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC micro; MMC mobile; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO duo; MS PRO duo HS; MS PRO duo mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG duo; MS Pro-HG duo HX; MS XC-HG duo; MS duo; MS micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; MicroSD (transflash); Microdrive; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; Nano memory (NM); Não compatível; P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; SR memory; Smart media; Smart media xD; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; XQD; expressP2; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; Outro
hr-HR: Kompatibilne memorijske kartice: CF; CF tip II; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC Micro; Mobilni MMC; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO Duo; MS PRO Duo HS; MS PRO Duo Mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG Duo; MS Pro-HG Duo HX; MS XC-HG Duo; MS Duo; MS Micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; MicroSD (TransFlash); Microdrive; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; Nano memorija (NM); Nije podržano; P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; SR memorija; SmartMedia; SmartMedia xD; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; XQD; expressP2; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; Ostalo
ro-RO: Carduri de memorie compatibile: CF; CF tip II; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC micro; MMC mobile; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO duo; MS PRO duo HS; MS PRO duo mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG duo; MS Pro-HG duo HX; MS XC-HG duo; MS duo; MS micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; MicroSD (transflash); Microdrive; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; Nano memorie (NM); Neacceptat; P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; SR memory; Smart media; Smart media xD; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; XQD; expressP2; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; Altele
nl: Compatibele geheugenkaarten: CF; CF Type II; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC micro; MMC mobiel; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO duo; MS PRO duo HS; MS PRO duo mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG duo; MS Pro-HG duo HX; MS XC-HG duo; MS duo; MS micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; MicroSD (transflash); Microdrive; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; Nano-geheugen (NM); Niet ondersteund; P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; SR-geheugen; Smart media; Smart media xD; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; XQD; expressP2; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; Andere
pl: Zgodne karty pamięci: CF; CF Typ II; CF+; Cfast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC micro; MMC mobile; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO duo; MS PRO duo HS; MS PRO duo mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG duo; MS Pro-HG duo HX; MS XC-HG duo; MS duo; MS micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; MicroSD (transflash); Microdrive; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; Pamięć nano (NM); Nieobsługiwane; P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; Pamięć SR; Smart media; Smart media xD; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; XQD; expressP2; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; Pozostałe